Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 1. License Types.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.010.
Types of licenses.

A license defines activities allowed daily on licensed premises. License type is a general category of license activity based on the three-tier system of alcohol regulation. The three types of licenses the board may issue are manufacturer, wholesale, and retail licenses. The board may issue only the licenses authorized in AS

04.09.020

—

04.09.370

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)